Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-3] State and county safe routes to
school programs; coordinators; grants; reports. (a) There is established,
within the department of transportation, a safe routes to school program that
shall, among other things, enhance traffic safety around Hawaii's schools,
enable and encourage children to walk and bicycle to school, and make bicycling
and walking to school a safer and more appealing transportation alternative.

(b) There is created, within the department of
transportation, the position of safe routes to school program coordinator. The
safe routes to school program coordinator shall provide a central point of
contact for the federal safe routes to school program.

(c) A county designated office, through the
county safe routes to school program coordinator, and in consultation with the
department of education, department of health, and Hawaii Association of
Independent Schools, shall provide safe routes to school funds for school-based
and community-based workshops and infrastructure and non-infrastructure
projects that will reduce vehicular traffic and congestion, encourage walking
and bicycling, and promote health and safety around Hawaii's schools.

(d) The director of transportation, through
the safe routes to school program coordinator and in consultation with county
safe routes to school program coordinators, shall develop a mechanism to
provide funds to county safe routes to school programs from the safe routes to
school program special fund established under section 291C-4 to be used for the
implementation of county safe routes to school program projects.

(e) Implementation of the county safe routes
to school program shall take into consideration the need to:

(1) Fill a permanent, full-time position of safe
routes to school coordinator within the county designated office;

(2) Maximize the participation of school officials
and stakeholder groups in the community;

(3) Work in conjunction with county designated safe
routes to school stakeholders and train volunteer facilitators for school-based
workshops and community-based projects, including flexible training schedules;

(4) Train potential grant requestors and stakeholder
groups in federal and state requirements necessary for procurement, contracts,
design, and construction; and

(5) Allocate not less than ten per cent and not more
than thirty per cent of safe routes to school funds for
non-infrastructure-related activities or activities to encourage walking and
bicycling to school, public awareness campaigns, student sessions on bicycle
and pedestrian safety, or other non-infrastructure activities as prescribed
under section 1404 of the 2005 Safe, Accountable,
Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users, Public Law
No. 109-59.

(f) Each grant proposal in the county safe
routes to school program shall:

(1) Identify the modes of travel used by students to
get to school;

(2) Determine the number of students using each mode
of travel;

(3) Survey the parents of each student to gather
information regarding the factors involved in the choice of transportation mode for the student and, where the student
travels by automobile or bus,
conditions that would need to change for the parent to permit the
student to walk or ride a bicycle to school, and obstacles to walking and
biking; and

(4) Identify traffic infrastructure elements in the
immediate vicinity of each school, including multi-lane roadways, speed limits,
and traffic calming features that, either by their presence or absence,
contribute to the use of automobiles as a student's mode of travel to school.

(g) The
director of transportation, in consultation with organizations that have
received non-infrastructure and pending infrastructure
grants, shall develop a streamlined process for the safe routes to
school program that meets federal and state requirements, simplifies the
application process, and expedites release
of funding after completion of school-based and community-based projects
for infrastructure and non-infrastructure.

(h) The
director of transportation shall submit to the legislature an annual report of the
status and progress of the safe routes to school program, including an
accounting of all grants provided through the program and a timeline for future
grant awards, no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
requiring actions or omissions that
would render the State ineligible to receive funds for the safe routes to school program under the 2005 Safe, Accountable,
Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users, Public Law
No. 109-59. [L 2012, c 317, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next